California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(i) Subdivision (b) of Section 18640, in lieu of Section 6044(e) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to statements to be furnished to persons with respect to whom information is required.

(ii) Subdivision (b) of Section 18644, in lieu of Section 6050A(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to written statement.

(B) References to Sections 6031(b), 6037(b), 6041A(e), 6045(d), 6051(d), 6053(b), and 6053(c) of the Internal Revenue Code shall not apply.

(C) The term “payee statement” shall also include the statement required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 18662.

(e) In the case of each failure to provide a written explanation as required by Section 402(f) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to written explanation to recipients of distributions eligible for rollover treatment, at the time prescribed therefor, unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause and not to willful neglect, there shall be paid, on notice and demand of the Franchise Tax Board and in the same manner as tax, by the person failing to provide that written explanation, an amount equal to ten dollars ($10) for each failure, but the total amount imposed on that person for all those failures during any calendar year shall not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(f) Any penalty imposed by this part shall be paid on notice and demand by the Franchise Tax Board and in the same manner as tax.

(g) The amendments made to this section by Chapter 359 of the Statutes of 2015 apply to information returns required to be filed on or after January 1, 2016.

(h) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to information returns required to be filed on or after January 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 71.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19184.

(a) A penalty of fifty dollars ($50) shall be imposed for each failure, unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause, by any person required to file who fails to file a report at the time and in the manner required by any of the following provisions:

(1) Subdivision (c) of Section 17507, relating to individual retirement accounts.

(2) Section 220(h) of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to
 medical savings accounts for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(3) Subdivision (b) of Section 17140.3 or subdivision (b) of Section 23711 relating to qualified tuition programs.

(4) Subdivision (e) of Section 23712, relating to Coverdell education savings accounts.

(b) (1) Any individual who:

(A) Is required to furnish information under Section 17508 as to the amount designated nondeductible contributions made for any taxable year, and

(B) Overstates the amount of those contributions made for that taxable year, shall pay a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) for each overstatement unless it is shown that the overstatement is due to reasonable
 cause.

(2) Any individual who fails to file a form required to be filed by the Franchise Tax Board under Section 17508 shall pay a penalty of fifty dollars ($50) for each failure unless it is shown that the failure is due to reasonable cause.

(c) Article 3 (commencing with Section 19031) of this chapter (relating to deficiency assessments) shall not apply in respect of the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 48.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19185.

(a) Section 6695A of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to substantial and gross valuation misstatements attributable to incorrect appraisals, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) This section shall apply to appraisals with respect to returns or submissions filed on or after January 1, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 51.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19186.

(a) Section 6720B of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to the fraudulent identification of exempt use property, shall apply, except as otherwise provided.

(b) This section shall apply to identifications made after January 1, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 14, Sec. 52.   (SB 401)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

19187.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board shall include with each notice imposing a penalty under this part information that contains the name of the penalty, the section of this part under which the penalty is imposed, and a description of the computation of the penalty. Upon the request of the taxpayer, the Franchise Tax Board shall also provide a computation of the penalty imposed.

(b) (1) No penalty under this part shall be imposed unless the initial determination of the imposition of the penalty is personally approved in writing by the immediate supervisor of the individual making that determination or a higher level official as designated by the executive officer, or the officer’s delegee.

(2) Paragraph (1) shall not apply to any of the following:

(A) Any addition to tax under Sections 19131, 19132, 19136, or 19142.

(B) Any addition to tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 19164. 

(C) Any other penalty automatically calculated through electronic means.

(D) Any penalty resulting from a change or correction by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue or other officer of the United States or other competent authority required to be reported under subdivision (a) of Section 18622.

(c) For purposes of this section, “penalty” includes any addition to tax or any additional amount.

(d) This section shall apply to notices issued and penalties imposed after December 31, 2001.

(e) The
 amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply for additions to tax imposed on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 34, Sec. 30.   (SB 167)   Effective June 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Voluntary Disclosure Program [19191. - 19194.]

19191.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board may enter into a voluntary disclosure agreement with any qualified entity, qualified shareholder, qualified member, qualified beneficiary, or qualified partner, as defined in Section 19192, that is binding on both the Franchise Tax Board and the qualified entity, qualified shareholder, qualified member, qualified beneficiary, or qualified partner.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide guidelines and establish procedures for qualified entities and their qualified shareholders, qualified members, qualified beneficiaries, or qualified partners to apply for voluntary disclosure agreements.

(2) Accept applications on an anonymous basis from qualified entities and their qualified shareholders, qualified members, qualified beneficiaries, or qualified partners for voluntary disclosure agreements.

(3) Implement procedures for accepting applications for voluntary disclosure agreements through the National Nexus Program administered by the Multistate Tax Commission.

(4) For purposes of considering offers from
 qualified entities and their qualified shareholders, qualified members, qualified beneficiaries, or qualified partners to enter into voluntary disclosure agreements, take into account the following criteria:

(A) The nature and magnitude of the qualified entity’s previous presence and activity in this state and the facts and circumstances by which the nexus of the qualified entity or qualified shareholder, qualified member, qualified beneficiary, or qualified partner was established.

(B) The extent to which the weight of the factual circumstances demonstrates that a prudent business person exercising reasonable care would conclude that the previous activities and presence in this state were or were not immune from taxation by this state by reason of Public Law 86-272 or otherwise.

(C) Reasonable reliance on the advice
 of a person in a fiduciary position or other competent advice that the qualified entity or qualified shareholder, qualified member, qualified beneficiary, or qualified partner activities were immune from taxation by this state.

(D) Lack of evidence of willful disregard or neglect of the tax laws of this state on the part of the qualified entity, qualified shareholder, qualified member, qualified beneficiary, or qualified partner.

(E) Demonstrations of good faith on the part of the qualified entity, qualified shareholder, qualified member, qualified beneficiary, or qualified partner.

(F) Benefits that will accrue to the state by entering into a voluntary disclosure agreement.

(5) Act on any application of a voluntary disclosure agreement within 120 days
 of receipt.

(6) Enter into voluntary disclosure agreements with qualified entities, qualified shareholders, qualified members, qualified beneficiaries, or qualified partners, as authorized in subdivision (a) and based on the criteria set forth in paragraph (4).

(c) Before any voluntary disclosure agreement becomes binding, the Franchise Tax Board, itself, shall approve the agreement in the following manner:

(1) The Executive Officer and Chief Counsel of the Franchise Tax Board shall recommend and submit the voluntary disclosure agreement to the Franchise Tax Board for approval.

(2) Each voluntary disclosure agreement recommendation shall be submitted in a manner as to maintain the anonymity of the taxpayer applying for the voluntary disclosure
 agreement.

(3) A recommendation for approval of a voluntary disclosure agreement shall be approved or disapproved by the Franchise Tax Board, itself, within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation to the board.

(4) A recommendation of a voluntary disclosure agreement that is not either approved or disapproved by the board within 45 days of the submission of that recommendation shall be deemed approved.

(5) Disapproval of a recommendation of a voluntary disclosure agreement shall be made only by a majority vote of the Franchise Tax Board.

(6) The members of the Franchise Tax Board shall not participate in any voluntary disclosure agreement except as provided in this subdivision.

(d) The voluntary disclosure agreement entered into by the Franchise Tax Board and the qualified entity, qualified shareholder, qualified member, qualified beneficiary, or qualified partner as provided for in subdivision (a) shall to the extent applicable specify that:

(1) The Franchise Tax Board shall with respect to a qualified entity, qualified shareholder, qualified member, qualified beneficiary, or qualified partner, except as provided in paragraph (4), (6), (9), or (11) of subdivision (a) of Section 19192:

(A) (i) Waive its authority under this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) to assess or propose to assess taxes, additions to tax, fees, or penalties with respect to each taxable year ending prior to six years from the signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement.

(ii) The waiver of authority to assess or propose to assess taxes, additions to tax, fees, or penalties under clause (i) with respect to the income of a trust for a taxable year ending prior to six years from the signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement shall not prevent the taxation of income of a beneficiary of a trust pursuant to Section 17745.

(B) With respect to each of the six taxable years ending immediately preceding the signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement, based on its discretion, agree to waive any or all of the following:

(i) A penalty related to a failure to make and file a return, as provided in Section 19131.

(ii) A penalty related to a failure to pay any amount due by the date prescribed for payment, as provided in
 Section 19132.

(iii) An addition to tax related to an underpayment of estimated tax, as provided in Section 19136.

(iv) A penalty related to Section 6810 or subdivision (a) of Section 8810 of the Corporations Code, as provided in Section 19141 of this code.

(v) A penalty related to a failure to furnish information or maintain records, as provided in Section 19141.5.

(vi) An addition to tax related to an underpayment of tax imposed under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), as provided in Section 19142.

(vii) A penalty related to a partnership required to file a return under Section 18633 or 18633.5, as provided in Section 19172.

(viii) A penalty related to an “S” corporation required to file a return under Section 18601, as provided in Section 19172.5.

(ix) A penalty related to a failure to file information returns, as provided in Section 19183.

(x) A penalty related to relief from contract voidability, as provided in Section 23305.1.

(2) The qualified entity, qualified shareholder, qualified member, qualified beneficiary, or qualified partner shall:

(A) With respect to each of the six taxable years ending immediately preceding the signing date of the written agreement:

(i) Voluntarily and fully disclose on the qualified entity’s application all material facts pertinent to the qualified entity’s,
 shareholder’s, member’s, beneficiary’s, or partner’s liability for any taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(ii) Except as provided in paragraph (3), within 30 days from the signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement:

(I) File all returns required under this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(II) Pay in full any tax, interest, fee, and penalties, other than those penalties specifically waived by the Franchise Tax Board under the terms of the voluntary disclosure agreement, imposed under this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) in a manner as may be prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. Paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) of Section
 23153 shall not apply to qualified entities admitted into the voluntary disclosure program.

(B) Agree to comply with all franchise and income tax laws of this state in subsequent taxable years by filing all returns required and paying all amounts due under this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(3) The Franchise Tax Board may extend the time for filing returns and paying amounts due to 120 days from the signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement or to the latest extended due date of the return for a taxable year for which relief is granted, whichever is later.

(e) An addition to tax under Section 19136 or 19142 shall not be made for any underpayment of estimated tax attributable to the underpayment of an installment of estimated tax due before the
 signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement.

(f) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1996 shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(g) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 543 of the Statutes of 2001 shall apply to voluntary disclosure agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2002.

(h) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 354 of the Statutes of 2004 shall apply to voluntary disclosure agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2005.

(i) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 296 of the Statutes of 2011 shall apply to voluntary disclosure agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2011.

(j) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to voluntary disclosure agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 288, Sec. 1.   (SB 813)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19192.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) (1) “Qualified entity” means an entity that is all of the following:

(A) A corporation, as defined in Section 23038, a limited liability company, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 17941, a qualified
 trust, as defined in paragraph (7), or a qualified partnership, as defined in paragraph (12).

(B) An entity, including any predecessors to the entity, that previously has never filed a return with the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23011).

(C) An entity, including any predecessors to the entity, that previously has not been the subject of an inquiry by the Franchise Tax Board with respect to liability for any of the taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001).

(D) An entity that voluntarily comes forward prior to any unilateral contact from the Franchise Tax Board, makes application for a voluntary disclosure agreement in a form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax
 Board, and makes a full and accurate statement of its activities in this state for the six immediately preceding taxable years.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a qualified entity does not include any of the following:

(i) An entity that is organized and existing under the laws of this state.

(ii) An entity that is qualified or registered with the office of the Secretary of State.

(iii) An entity that maintains and staffs a permanent facility in this state.

(B) For purposes of this paragraph, the storing of materials, goods, or products in a public warehouse pursuant to a public warehouse contract does not constitute maintaining a permanent facility in this
 state.

(3) “Qualified shareholder” means an individual that is all of the following:

(A) A nonresident on the signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement.

(B) A shareholder of an “S” corporation (defined in Section 23800) that has applied for a voluntary disclosure agreement under this article under which all material facts pertinent to the shareholder’s liability would be disclosed on that “S” corporation’s voluntary disclosure agreement as required under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191.

(4) Notwithstanding paragraph (3), subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191 shall not apply to any of the six taxable years immediately preceding the signing date that the qualified
 shareholder was a California resident required to file a California tax return, nor to any penalties or additions to tax attributable to income other than the California source income from the “S” corporation that filed an application under this article.

(5) “Qualified member” means an individual, corporation, or limited liability company that is all of the following:

(A) (i) In the case of an individual, is a nonresident on the signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement.

(ii) In the case of a corporation or limited liability company, is not either of the following:

(I) Organized under the laws of this state.

(II) Qualified or registered with the office of the
 Secretary of State.

(B) A member of a limited liability company that has applied for a voluntary disclosure agreement under this article under which all material facts pertinent to the member’s liability would be disclosed on that limited liability company’s voluntary disclosure agreement as required under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191.

(6) Notwithstanding paragraph (5), in the case of a qualified member who is an individual, subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191 shall not apply to any of the six taxable years immediately preceding the signing date that the qualified member was a California resident required to file a California tax return, nor to any penalties or additions to tax attributable to income other than the California source income from the limited liability company that filed an
 application under this article.

(7) “Qualified trust” means a trust, the administration of which has never been performed in California. For purposes of this paragraph, administrative activities performed in California would be deemed to be performed outside of California if those activities were inconsequential to the overall administration of the trust.

(8) “Qualified beneficiary” means an individual who is all of the following:

(A) A nonresident on the signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement and a nonresident during each of the six taxable years ending immediately preceding the signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement.

(B) A beneficiary with a contingent or noncontingent interest in the qualified trust. A beneficiary’s trust
 interest for a taxable year is not contingent if the trust has made any distribution to that beneficiary.

(C) A beneficiary of a qualified trust that has applied for a voluntary disclosure agreement under this article under which all material facts pertinent to the beneficiary’s liability would be disclosed on that trust’s voluntary disclosure agreement as required under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191.

(9) Notwithstanding paragraph (8), subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191 shall not apply to any penalties or additions to tax attributable to income other than income from the trust that filed an application under this article.

(10) “Qualified partner” means an individual that is both of the following:

(A) A nonresident of this state as of the signing date of the voluntary disclosure agreement.

(B) A partner of a qualified partnership that has applied for a voluntary disclosure agreement under this article under which all material facts pertinent to the partner’s liability would be disclosed on the partnership’s voluntary disclosure agreement as required under clause (i) of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191.

(11) Notwithstanding paragraph (10), in the case of a qualified partner, subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191 shall not apply to any of the six taxable years immediately preceding the signing date that the qualified partner was a California resident required to file a California tax return, nor to any penalties or additions to tax attributable to
 income other than the California source income from the partnership that filed an application under this article.

(12) “Qualified partnership” means a partnership, as defined in Section 17008, a limited partnership, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 17935, or a limited liability partnership, within the meaning of Section 17948.

(b) “Signing date” of the voluntary disclosure agreement means the date on which a person duly authorized by the Franchise Tax Board signs the agreement.

(c) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1996 shall apply to taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 1997.

(d) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 543 of the Statutes of 2001 shall apply to voluntary disclosure agreements
 entered into on or after January 1, 2002.

(e) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to voluntary disclosure agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2005.

(f) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to voluntary disclosure agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 288, Sec. 2.   (SB 813)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

19193.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to mean that by accepting and signing a voluntary disclosure agreement the Franchise Tax Board abdicates the right and authority to examine returns and determine the correct amount of tax for any of the taxable years covered by the voluntary disclosure period agreed upon and to assess any additional tax, penalty, or interest owed as a result of that examination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19194.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, a voluntary disclosure agreement shall be null and void in the event that the Franchise Tax Board finds that with respect to the agreement any of the following circumstances exist:

(1) The qualified entity has misrepresented any material fact in applying for the voluntary
 disclosure agreement or in entering into the agreement.

(2) The qualified entity fails to file any returns for any taxable year covered by the voluntary disclosure period agreed upon on or before the due date prescribed under the terms of the agreement in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191.

(3) (A) The qualified entity fails to pay in full any tax, fee, penalty, or interest due within the time prescribed under the terms of the voluntary disclosure agreement in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191 or to pay any installments thereof due within the time prescribed under the terms of an installment payment arrangement in accordance with subparagraph (B).

(B) The Franchise Tax Board may enter into an installment payment arrangement, which
 shall include provisions for interest, in lieu of the full payment required under paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191. Failure by the qualified entity to comply with the terms of the installment payment arrangement shall also render the voluntary disclosure agreement null and void.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), an applicant applying for an installment payment arrangement shall have the same time periods as identified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 19008 to pay in full any tax, fee, penalty, or interest due.

(4) The tax shown by the qualified entity on its tax return filed for any taxable year covered by the voluntary disclosure agreement, including any amount shown on a qualified amended return, as defined in Section 1.6664-2(c)(3) of Title 26 of the Code of Federal Regulations, understates by 10 percent or more the tax
 imposed under either Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) and the qualified entity cannot demonstrate to the satisfaction of the Franchise Tax Board that a good faith effort was made to accurately compute the tax.

(5) The qualified entity fails to begin to prospectively comply with all franchise and income tax laws of this state as agreed upon under the terms of the voluntary disclosure agreement in accordance with paragraph (2) of subdivision (d) of Section 19191.

(b) In the event that the Franchise Tax Board finds that the qualified entity has failed to comply under any of the circumstances which render the voluntary disclosure agreement null and void as set forth in subdivision (a), the limitation on assessment for any taxable years and the waiver of any penalties as provided for in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) and subdivision
 (h) of Section 19191 shall not be binding on the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) The amendments to this section made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to voluntary disclosure agreements entered into on or after January 1, 2011.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 280.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Public Disclosure of Tax Delinquencies [19195. - 19195.]

19195.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, including Section 7920.500 and Article 3 (commencing with Section 7928.200) of Chapter 14 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the Franchise Tax Board shall make available as a matter of public record at least twice each calendar year a list of the 500 largest tax delinquencies in excess of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) under Part 10 and Part 11 of this division. For purposes of compiling the list, a tax delinquency means the total amount owed by a taxpayer to the State of California for which a notice of state tax lien has been recorded in any county recorder’s office in this state, pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the
 Government Code.

(b) For purposes of the list, a tax delinquency does not include any of the following and may not be included on the list:

(1) A delinquency for which payment arrangements have been agreed to by both the taxpayer and the Franchise Tax Board and the taxpayer is in compliance with the arrangement.

(2) A delinquency for which the taxpayer has filed for bankruptcy protection pursuant to Title 11 of the United States Code.

(3) A delinquency for which the person or persons liable for the tax have contacted the Franchise Tax Board and for which resolution of the tax delinquency has been accepted by the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) Each list shall, with respect to each delinquency, include all the following:

(1) The name of the person or persons liable for payment of the tax and that person’s or persons’ address.

(2) The amount of tax delinquency as shown on the notice or notices of state tax lien and any applicable interest or penalties, less any amounts paid.

(3) The earliest date that a notice of state tax lien was filed.

(4) The type of tax that is delinquent.

(5) The type, status, and license number of any occupational or professional license held by the person or
 persons liable for payment of the tax.

(6) The names and titles of the principal officers of the person liable for payment of the tax if that person is a limited liability company or corporation. The Franchise Tax Board shall refer to the limited liability company’s or the corporation’s Statement of Information filed with the Secretary of State or to the limited liability company’s or the corporation’s tax return filed pursuant to this part to determine the principal officers of the limited liability company or corporation. Principal officers appearing on a list solely pursuant to this paragraph shall not be subject to Section 494.5 of the Business and Professions Code, or Section 10295.4 of the Public Contract Code.

(d) Prior to making a tax delinquency a matter of public
 record as required by this section, the Franchise Tax Board shall provide a preliminary written notice to the person or persons liable for the tax by certified mail, return receipt requested. If within 30 days after issuance of the notice, the person or persons do not remit the amount due or make arrangements with the Franchise Tax Board for payment of the amount due, the tax delinquency shall be included on the list.

(e) The list described in subdivision (a) shall include the following:

(1) The telephone number and address of the Franchise Tax Board office to contact if a person believes placement of the person’s name on the list is in error.

(2) The aggregate number of persons that have appeared on the list
 who have satisfied their delinquencies in their entirety and the dollar amounts, in the aggregate, that have been paid attributable to those delinquencies.

(f) As promptly as feasible, but no later than five business days from the occurrence of any of the following, the Franchise Tax Board shall remove that taxpayer’s name from the list of tax delinquencies:

(1) Tax delinquencies for which the person liable for the tax has contacted the Franchise Tax Board and resolution of the delinquency has been arranged.

(2) Tax delinquencies for which the Franchise Tax Board has verified that an active bankruptcy proceeding has been initiated.

(3) Tax delinquencies for which
 the Franchise Tax Board has verified that a bankruptcy proceeding has been completed and there are no assets available with which to pay the delinquent amount or amounts.

(4) Tax delinquencies that the Franchise Tax Board has determined to be uncollectible.

(g) A person whose delinquency appears on the list, and who satisfies that delinquency in whole or in part, may request the
 Franchise Tax Board to include in its list any payments that person made to satisfy the delinquency. Upon receipt of that request, the Franchise Tax Board shall include those payments on the list as promptly as feasible.

(h) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a person whose delinquency appeared on the list and whose name has been removed pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (f) shall comply with the terms of the arranged resolution. If the person fails to do so, the Franchise Tax Board may add that person’s name to the list of delinquencies without providing the prior written notice otherwise required by subdivision (d).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 418.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Collection of Tax [19201. - 19298.]



  ARTICLE 1. Judgment for Tax [19201. - 19209.]

19201.

If any amount due under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or any amount that may be collected by the Franchise Tax Board as though it were a tax, is not paid, the Franchise Tax Board may file in the Office of the Clerk of the Court of Sacramento County, or any other county, a certificate specifying the amount due, the name and last known address of the taxpayer liable for the
 amount due, and the fact that the Franchise Tax Board has complied with all provisions of the law in the computation and levy of the amount due, and a request that judgment be entered against the taxpayer in the amount set forth in the certificate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 366, Sec. 24.   (SB 974)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19202.

The clerk of the court immediately upon the filing of the certificate shall enter a judgment for the people of the State of California against the taxpayer in the amount set forth in the certificate. The clerk of the court may file the judgment in a loose-leaf book entitled “Personal Income Tax Judgments” or “Bank and Corporation Tax Judgments,” as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 366, Sec. 25.   (SB 974)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19203.

An abstract or a copy of the judgment may be recorded with the county recorder of any county. From the time of the recording, the amount set forth constitutes a lien upon all real property of the taxpayer in the county, owned by the taxpayer or afterward and before the lien expires acquired by the taxpayer. Such lien has the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien and continues for 10 years from the date of the recording unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19204.

Within 10 years from the date of the recording or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner provided in this section, the lien may be extended by recording in the office of the county recorder of any county an abstract or copy of the judgment. From the time of the recording the lien extends to the property in the county for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19205.

Execution shall issue upon the judgment upon request of the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments, and sales shall be held under the execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19206.

The Franchise Tax Board may, at any time, release all or any portion of the property subject to any lien provided for in this article from the lien or subordinate the lien to other liens if it determines that the taxes are sufficiently secured by a lien on other property of the taxpayer or that the release or subordination of the lien will not endanger or jeopardize the collection of the taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19207.

The Franchise Tax Board may release any lien imposed under Section 19203 or 19204 if it finds that the liability represented by the lien, including any interest accrued thereon, is legally unenforceable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19208.

A certificate by the Franchise Tax Board to the effect that any property has been released from a lien or that the lien has been subordinated to other liens is conclusive evidence that the property has been released or that the lien has been subordinated as provided in the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19209.

If the Franchise Tax Board records a certificate of release pursuant to Section 19206 or 19207, the cost of recording is an obligation of the taxpayer and may be collected from the taxpayer in any manner provided in this part for the collection of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Lien of Tax [19221. - 19226.]

19221.

(a) If any taxpayer or person fails to pay any liability imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) at the time that it becomes due and payable, the amount thereof, (including any interest, additional amount, addition to tax, or penalty, together with any costs that may accrue in addition thereto) shall thereupon be a perfected and enforceable state tax lien. This lien is subject to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) For the purpose of this section, amounts are “due and payable” on the following dates:

(1) For amounts of any liability disclosed on a return filed on or before the date payment is due (with regard to any extension of time to pay), the date the amount is established on the records of the Franchise Tax Board, except that in no case will it be prior to the day after the payment due date;

(2) For amounts of any liability disclosed on a return filed after the date payment is due (with regard to any extension of time to pay), the date the amount is established on the records of the Franchise Tax Board;

(3) For amounts of any liability determined under Section 19081 or 19082 (pertaining to jeopardy assessments), the date the notice of the Franchise Tax
 Board’s finding is mailed or issued;

(4) For all other amounts of liability, the date the assessment is final.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), during any period that Section 362 of Title 11 of the United States Code applies, any tax lien that would otherwise attach to property by reason of subdivision (a) shall not take effect, unless the tax is a debt of the debtor that will not be discharged in the bankruptcy proceeding and the property or its proceeds are transferred out of the bankruptcy estate to, or otherwise revested in, the debtor.
